Hawaii statutes.
[§551A-3] When not appointed. The
public guardian shall not be appointed if another suitable guardian is
available and willing to accept the guardianship appointment, unless the court
finds that the best interests of the ward would be better served by the
appointment of the public guardian. [L 1984, c 223, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next